Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.090

Parents for parents program—Funding, administration—Program advisors.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the parents for parents program shall be funded through the office of public defense and centrally administered through a pass-through to a Washington state nonprofit-lead organization that has extensive experience supporting parent allies.

(2) Through the contract with the lead organization, each local program must be locally administered by the county superior court or a nonprofit organization that shall serve as the host organization.

(3) Local stakeholders representing key child welfare systems shall serve as parents for parents program advisors. Examples of local stakeholders include the department of children, youth, and families, the superior court, attorneys for the parents, assistant attorneys general, and court-appointed special advocates or guardians ad litem.

(4) A parent ally lead shall provide program coordination and maintain local program information.

(5) The lead organization shall provide ongoing training to the host organizations, statewide program oversight and coordination, and maintain statewide program information.

[ 2020 c 33 s 6; 2018 c 58 s 66; 2015 c 117 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2020 c 33: See note following RCW 74.13.715.

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Intent—2015 c 117: See note following RCW 2.70.060.